vi: Tốc độ định mức: Nhanh; Trung bình; Chậm; Khác
pt-PT: Classificação de velocidade: Rápido; Médio; Lento; Outro
de: Geschwindigkeitsklasse: Schnell; Mittel; Langsam; Sonstige
it: Valore nominale di velocità: Veloce; Medio; Lento; Altro
zh-CN: 速度等级: 快; 中; 慢; 其他
da: Hastighedsklassificering: Hurtig; Medium; Langsom; Andet
sv: Hastighetsklassificering: Snabb; Medel; Långsam; Annat
fi: Nopeusluokitus: Nopea; Keskitaso; Hidas; Muu
nl: Snelheidsclassificatie: Snel; Gemiddeld; Langzaam; Overige
ro-RO: Indice de viteză: Rapid; Mediu; Lent; Altele
es: Clasificación de velocidad: Rápido; Medio; Lento; Otro
hu: Sebességbesorolás: Gyors; Közepes; Lassú; Egyéb
fr: Indice de vitesse: Rapide; Moyen; Lent; Autre
cs: Rychlostní index: Rychlé; Střední; Pomalé; Jiné
tr: Hız derecelendirmesi: Hızlı; Orta; Yavaş; Diğer
ja: 速度評価: 高速; 中速; 低速; その他
lt-LT: Greičio klasė: Greitas; Vidutinis; Lėtas; Kita
pt-BR: Velocidade classificação: Rápido; Médio; Lento; Outros
nb: Hastighetsvurdering: Rask; Medium; Treg; Annet
hr-HR: Indeks brzine: Brzo; Srednje; Sporo; Ostalo
ru: Скоростная категория: Быстрая; Средняя; Медленная; Другое
sl-SI: Razred hitrosti: Hitro; Srednje; Počasi; Drugo
ko: 속도 등급: 빠름; 중간; 느림; 기타
en: Speed rating: Fast; Medium; Slow; Other
el: Κατηγορία ταχύτητας: Γρήγορη; Μεσαία; Αργή; Άλλο
th: ระดับความเร็ว: เร็ว; ปานกลาง; ช้า; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Index rýchlosti: Rýchle; Stredné; Pomalé; Iná
pl: Klasa prędkości: Szybka; Średnia; Wolna; Inne
zh-TW: 速度評級: 快; 中; 慢; 其他
bg-BG: Индекс на скоростта: Бързо; Средно; Бавно; Друго